src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 310KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>å # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 311
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>å # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 311K1
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>å # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 311K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>å # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 311KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>å # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ee # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>een # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ei # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ene # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ene # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 312
 +Inf:%>be # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ber # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>beden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>bedi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedne # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>be # ;

LEXICON 312K1
 +Inf:%>be # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ber # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>beden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>bedi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedne # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>be # ;

LEXICON 313
 +Inf:%>be # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ber # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bede # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bede # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>beden # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedne # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>be # ;

LEXICON 313K1
 +Inf:%>be # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ber # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bede # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bede # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>beden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>bedi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedne # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>be # ;

LEXICON 314
 +Inf:%>be # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ber # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>be # ;

LEXICON 314K1
 +Inf:%>be # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ber # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>be # ;

LEXICON 315
 +Inf:%>be # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ber # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>be # ;

LEXICON 315K1
 +Inf:%>be # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ber # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>be # ;

LEXICON 316
 +Inf:%>bede # ;
 +Inf:%>beda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bed # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>bed # ;

LEXICON 316K1
 +Inf:%>bede # ;
 +Inf:%>beda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bed # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>bed # ;

LEXICON 316K2
 +Inf:%>bede # ;
 +Inf:%>beda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>beder # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>bed # ;

LEXICON 316KL
 +Inf:%>bede # ;
 +Inf:%>beda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>beder # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>bed # ;

LEXICON 317
 +Inf:%>bede # ;
 +Inf:%>beda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bed # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>bed # ;

LEXICON 317K1
 +Inf:%>bede # ;
 +Inf:%>beda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>bed # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>bed # ;

LEXICON 317K2
 +Inf:%>bede # ;
 +Inf:%>beda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>beder # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>bed # ;

LEXICON 317KL
 +Inf:%>bede # ;
 +Inf:%>beda # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>beder # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>bedast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>bad # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>bedt # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>bedd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>bedde # ;
 +Adj:%>bedande # ;
 +Imp:%>bed # ;

LEXICON 318
 +Inf:%>ae # ;
 +Inf:%>aa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>aast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ó # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>aande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 318K1
 +Inf:%>ae # ;
 +Inf:%>aa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>aas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ó # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>aande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 318K2
 +Inf:%>ae # ;
 +Inf:%>aa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>aas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ó # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>aande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 318KL
 +Inf:%>ae # ;
 +Inf:%>aa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>aast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ó # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>aande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 319
 +Inf:%>ae # ;
 +Inf:%>aa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>aast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ó # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>aande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 319K1
 +Inf:%>ae # ;
 +Inf:%>aa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>aas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ó # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>aande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 319K2
 +Inf:%>ae # ;
 +Inf:%>aa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>aas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ó # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>aande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 319KL
 +Inf:%>ae # ;
 +Inf:%>aa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>aast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ó # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ae # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ai # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ane # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ane # ;
 +Adj:%>aande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;
