src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
augefare+V:augef 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=3652
be+V:b 314 ; ! LEMMA_ID=5851
bede+V:b 317 ; ! LEMMA_ID=5852
endefare+V:endef 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=18258
ete+V:ete 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=18956
fare+V:f 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=19854
forete+V:for 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24212
forfare+V:forf 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24230
gardfare+V:gardf 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=29376
handfare+V:handf 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34966
hundfare+V:hundf 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=38645
kappete+V:kapp 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=44877
misfare+V:misf 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=61183
naglefare+V:naglef 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=63479
naudbe+V:naudb 314 ; ! LEMMA_ID=63925
nibe+V:nib 315 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64576
ovete+V:ov 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68473
saumfare+V:saumf 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=78049
skamete+V:skam 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81272
skamfare+V:skamf 319 ; ! LEMMA_ID=81273
småete+V:små 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86495
tilbe+V:tilb 313 ; ! LEMMA_ID=96260
trøysteete+V:trøyste 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=100038
turrete+V:turr 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=100783
tørrete+V:tørr 311 ; ! LEMMA_ID=102088
